California statutes. Labor Code
(f) A profile audit review of the adjustment of claims against the Uninsured Employers Fund by the claims and collections unit of the Division of Workers’ Compensation shall be conducted at least every five years. The results of this profile audit review shall be included in the report required by subdivision (e).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

129.5.

(a) The administrative director may assess an administrative penalty against an insurer, self-insured employer, or third-party administrator for any of the following:

(1) Failure to comply with the notice of assessment issued pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 129 within 15 days of receipt.

(2) Failure to pay when due the undisputed portion of an indemnity payment, the reasonable cost of medical treatment of an injured worker, or a charge or cost implementing an approved vocational rehabilitation plan.

(3) Failure to comply with any rule or regulation of the administrative director.

(b) The administrative director shall promulgate regulations establishing a schedule of violations and the amount of the administrative penalty to be imposed for each type of violation. The schedule shall provide for imposition of a penalty of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation of the less serious type and for imposition of penalties in progressively higher amounts for the most serious types of violations to be set at up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation. The administrative director is authorized to impose penalties pursuant to rules and regulations which give due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the following factors:

(1) The gravity of the violation.

(2) The good faith of the insurer, self-insured employer, or third-party administrator.

(3) The history of previous violations, if any.

(4) The frequency of the violations.

(5) Whether the audit subject has met or exceeded the profile audit review performance standard.

(6) Whether a full compliance audit subject has met or exceeded the full compliance audit performance standard.

(7) The size of the audit subject location.

(c) The administrative director shall assess penalties as follows:

(1) If, after a profile audit review, the administrative director determines that the profile audit subject met or exceeded the profile audit review performance standard, no penalties shall be assessed under this section, but the audit subject shall be required to pay any compensation due and penalties due under subdivision (d) of Section 4650 as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 129.

(2) If, after a full compliance audit, the administrative director determines that the audit subject met or exceeded the full compliance audit performance standards, penalties for unpaid or late paid compensation, but no other penalties under this section, shall be assessed. The audit subject shall be required to pay any compensation due and penalties due under subdivision (d) of Section 4650 as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 129.

(3) If, after a full compliance audit, the administrative director determines that the audit subject failed to meet the full compliance audit performance standards, penalties shall be assessed as provided in a full compliance audit failure penalty schedule to be adopted by the administrative director. The full compliance audit failure penalty schedule shall adjust penalty levels relative to the size of the audit location to mitigate inequality between total penalties assessed against small and large audit subjects. The penalty amounts provided in the full compliance audit failure penalty schedule for the most serious type of violations shall not be limited by subdivision (b), but in no event shall the penalty for a single violation exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

(d) The notice of penalty assessment shall be served personally or by registered mail in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 11505 of the Government Code. The notice shall be in writing and shall describe the nature of the violation, including reference to the statutory provision or rule or regulation alleged to have been violated. The notice shall become final and the assessment shall be paid unless contested within 15 days of receipt by the insurer, self-insured employer, or third-party administrator.

(e) In addition to the penalty assessments permitted by subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), the administrative director may assess a civil penalty, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), upon finding, after hearing, that an employer, insurer, or third-party administrator for an employer has knowingly committed or performed with sufficient frequency so as to indicate a general business practice any of the following:

(1) Induced employees to accept less than compensation due, or made it necessary for employees to resort to proceedings against the employer to secure compensation.

(2) Refused to comply with known and legally indisputable compensation obligations.

(3) Discharged or administered compensation obligations in a dishonest manner.

(4) Discharged or administered compensation obligations in a manner as to cause injury to the public or those dealing with the employer or insurer. 

Any employer, insurer, or third-party administrator that fails to meet the full compliance audit performance standards in two consecutive full compliance audits shall be rebuttably presumed to have engaged in a general business practice of discharging and administering its compensation obligations in a manner causing injury to those dealing with it.

Upon a second or subsequent finding, the administrative director shall refer the matter to the Insurance Commissioner or the Director of Industrial Relations and request that a hearing be conducted to determine whether the certificate of authority, certificate of consent to self-insure, or certificate of consent to administer claims of self-insured employers, as the case may be, shall be revoked.

(f) An insurer, self-insured employer, or third-party administrator may file a written request for a conference with the administrative director within seven days after receipt of a notice of penalty assessment issued pursuant to subdivision (a) or (c). Within 15 days of the conference, the administrative director shall issue a notice of findings and serve it upon the contesting party by registered or certified mail. Any amount found due by the administrative director shall become due and payable 30 days after receipt of the notice of findings. The 30-day period shall be tolled during any appeal. A writ of mandate may be taken from the findings to the appropriate superior court upon the execution by the contesting party of a bond to the state in the principal sum that is double the amount found due and ordered by the administrative director, on the condition that the contesting party shall pay any judgment and costs rendered against it for the amount.

(g) An insurer, self-insured employer, or third-party administrator may file a written request for a hearing before the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board within seven days after receipt of a notice of penalty assessment issued pursuant to subdivision (e). Within 30 days of the hearing, the appeals board shall issue findings and orders and serve them upon the contesting party in the manner provided in its rules. Any amount found due by the appeals board shall become due and payable 45 days after receipt of the notice of findings. Judicial review of the findings and order shall be had in the manner provided by Article 2 (commencing with Section 5950) of Chapter 7 of Part 4 of Division 4. The 45-day period shall be tolled during appellate proceedings upon execution by the contesting party of a bond to the state in a principal sum that is double the amount found due and ordered by the appeals board on the condition that the contesting party shall pay the amount ultimately determined to be due and any costs awarded by an appellate court.

(h) Nothing in this section shall create nor eliminate a civil cause of action for the employee and his or her dependents.

(i) All moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

130.

The appeals board and each of its members, its secretary, assistant secretaries, and workers’ compensation judges, may administer oaths, certify to all official acts, and issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents and testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing or proceeding in any part of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

131.

Each witness who appears by order of the appeals board or any of its members, or a workers’ compensation judge, shall receive, if demanded, for his or her attendance the same fees and mileage allowed by law to a witness in civil cases, paid by the party at whose request the witness is subpoenaed, unless otherwise ordered by the appeals board. When any witness who has not been required to attend at the request of any party is subpoenaed by the appeals board, his or her fees and mileage may be paid from the funds appropriated for the use of the appeals board in the same manner as other expenses of the appeals board are paid. Any witness subpoenaed, except one whose fees and mileage are paid from the funds of the appeals board, may, at the time of service, demand the fee to which he or she is entitled for travel to and from the place at which he or she is required to appear, and one day’s attendance. If a witness demands his or her fees at the time of service, and they are not at that time paid or tendered, he or she shall not be required to attend as directed in the subpoena. All fees and mileage to which any witness is entitled under this section may be collected by action therefor instituted by the person to whom the fees are payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

132.

The superior court in and for the county in which any proceeding is held by the appeals board or a workers’ compensation judge may compel the attendance of witnesses, the giving of testimony and the production of papers, including books, accounts, and documents, as required by any subpoena regularly issued hereunder. In case of the refusal of any witness to obey the subpoena the appeals board or the workers’ compensation judge, before whom the testimony is to be given or produced, may report to the superior court in and for the county in which the proceeding is pending, by petition, setting forth that due notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of the witness, or the production of the papers, that the witness has been subpoenaed in the prescribed manner, and that the witness has failed and refused to obey the subpoena, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him or her in the course of the proceeding, and ask an order of the court, compelling the witness to attend and testify or produce the papers before the appeals board. The court shall thereupon enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place fixed in the order, the time to be not more than 10 days from the date of the order, and then and there show cause why he or she had not attended and testified or produced the papers before the appeals board or the workers’ compensation judge. A copy of the order shall be served upon the witness. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly issued hereunder and that the witness was legally bound to comply therewith, the court shall thereupon enter an order that the witness appear before the appeals board or the workers’ compensation judge at a time and place fixed in the order, and testify or produce the required papers, and upon failure to obey the order, the witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of court. The remedy provided in this section is cumulative, and shall not impair or interfere with the power of the appeals board or a member thereof to enforce the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, and to punish for contempt in the same manner and to the same extent as courts of record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

132a.

It is the declared policy of this state that there should not be discrimination against workers who are injured in the course and scope of their employment.

(1) Any employer who discharges, or threatens to discharge, or in any manner discriminates against any employee because he or she has filed or made known his or her intention to file a claim for compensation with his or her employer or an application for adjudication, or because the employee has received a rating, award, or settlement, is guilty of a misdemeanor and the employee’s compensation shall be increased by one-half, but in no event more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), together with costs and expenses not in excess of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). Any such employee shall also be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer. 

(2) Any insurer that advises, directs, or threatens an insured under penalty of cancellation or a raise in premium or for any other reason, to discharge an employee because he or she has filed or made known his or her intention to file a claim for compensation with his or her employer or an application for adjudication, or because the employee has received a rating, award, or settlement, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to the increased compensation and costs provided in paragraph (1).

(3) Any employer who discharges, or threatens to discharge, or in any manner discriminates against any employee because the employee testified or made known his or her intentions to testify in another employee’s case before the appeals board, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the employee shall be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer.

(4) Any insurer that advises, directs, or threatens an insured employer under penalty of cancellation or a raise in premium or for any other reason, to discharge or in any manner discriminate against an employee because the employee testified or made known his or her intention to testify in another employee’s case before the appeals board, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Proceedings for increased compensation as provided in paragraph (1), or for reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits, are to be instituted by filing an appropriate petition with the appeals board, but these proceedings may not be commenced more than one year from the discriminatory act or date of termination of the employee. The appeals board is vested with full power, authority, and jurisdiction to try and determine finally all matters specified in this section subject only to judicial review, except that the appeals board shall have no jurisdiction to try and determine a misdemeanor charge. The appeals board may refer and any worker may complain of suspected violations of the criminal misdemeanor provisions of this section to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, or directly to the office of the public prosecutor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1550, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

133.

The Division of Workers’ Compensation, including the administrative director and the appeals board, shall have power and jurisdiction to do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of any power or jurisdiction conferred upon it under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 559, Sec. 7.   (AB 1426)   Effective October 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

134.

The appeals board or any member thereof may issue writs or summons, warrants of attachment, warrants of commitment and all necessary process in proceedings for contempt, in like manner and to the same extent as courts of record. The process issued by the appeals board or any member thereof shall extend to all parts of the state and may be served by any persons authorized to serve process of courts of record or by any person designated for that purpose by the appeals board or any member thereof. The person executing process shall receive compensation allowed by the appeals board, not to exceed the fees prescribed by law for similar services. Such fees shall be paid in the same manner as provided herein for the fees of witnesses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

135.

In accordance with rules of practice and procedure that it may adopt, the appeals board may, with the approval of the Secretary of State, destroy or otherwise dispose of any file kept by it in connection with any proceeding under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) or Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 61.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

138.

The administrative director may appoint a deputy to act when he or she is absent from the state due to official business, vacation, or illness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 559, Sec. 8.   (AB 1426)   Effective October 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

138.1.

The administrative director shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate and shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 4.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

138.2.

(a) The headquarters of the Division of Workers’ Compensation shall be based at and operated from a centrally located city.

The administrative director shall have an office in that city with suitable rooms, necessary office furniture, stationery, and supplies, and may rent quarters in other places for the purpose of establishing branch or service offices, and for that purpose may provide those offices with necessary furniture, stationery, and supplies.

(b) The administrative director shall provide suitable rooms, with necessary office furniture, stationery, and supplies, for the appeals board at the centrally located city in which the board
 shall be based and from which it shall operate, and may rent quarters in other places for the purpose of establishing branch or service offices for the appeals board, and for that purpose may provide those offices with necessary furniture, stationery, and supplies.

(c) All meetings held by the administrative director shall be open and public. Notice thereof shall be published in papers of general circulation not more than 30 days and not less than 10 days prior to each meeting in Sacramento, San Francisco, Fresno, Los Angeles, and San Diego. Written notice of all meetings shall be given to all persons who request, in writing directed to the administrative director, that they be given notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 559, Sec. 10.   (AB 1426)   Effective October 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

138.3.

The administrative director shall, with respect to all injuries, prescribe, pursuant to Section 5402, reasonable rules and regulations requiring the employer to serve notice on the injured employee that he may be entitled to benefits under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1099.)
-------------------------------------------

138.4.

(a) For the purpose of this section, “claims administrator” means a self-administered workers’ compensation insurer; or a self-administered self-insured employer; or a self-administered legally uninsured employer; or a self-administered joint powers authority; or a third-party claims administrator for an insurer, a self-insured employer, a legally uninsured employer, or a joint powers authority.

(b) With respect to injuries resulting in lost time beyond the employee’s work shift at the time of injury or medical treatment beyond first aid:

(1) If the claims administrator obtains knowledge that the employer has not provided a claim form or a notice of potential eligibility for benefits to the employee,
 it shall provide the form and notice to the employee within three working days of its knowledge that the form or notice was not provided.

(2) If the claims administrator cannot determine if the employer has provided a claim form and notice of potential eligibility for benefits to the employee, the claims administrator shall provide the form and notice to the employee within 30 days of the administrator’s date of knowledge of the claim.

(c) The administrative director, in consultation with the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation, shall prescribe reasonable rules and regulations, including notice of the right to consult with an attorney, where appropriate, for serving on the employee (or employee’s dependents, in the case of death), the following:

(1) Notices dealing with the payment, nonpayment,
 or delay in payment of temporary disability, permanent disability, supplemental job displacement, and death benefits.

(2) Notices of any change in the amount or type of benefits being provided, the termination of benefits, the rejection of any liability for compensation, and an accounting of benefits paid.

(3) Notices of rights to select the primary treating physician, written continuity of care policies, requests for a comprehensive medical evaluation, and offers of regular, modified, or alternative work.

(d) The administrative director, in consultation with the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation, shall develop, make fully accessible on the department’s Internet Web site, and make available at district offices informational material written in plain language that describes the overall workers’
 compensation claims process, including the rights and obligations of employees and employers at every stage of a claim when a notice is required.

(e) Each notice prescribed by the administrative director shall be written in plain language, shall reference the informational material described in subdivision (d) to enable employees to understand the context of the notices, and shall clearly state the Internet Web site address and contact information that an employee may use to access the informational material.

(f) On or before January 1, 2018, the administrative director shall adopt regulations to provide employees with notice that they may access medical treatment outside of the workers’ compensation system following the denial of their claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 868, Sec. 1.   (SB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

138.5.

The Division of Workers’ Compensation shall cooperate in the enforcement of child support obligations. At the request of the Department of Child Support Services, the administrative director shall assist in providing to the State Department of Child Support Services information concerning persons who are receiving permanent disability benefits or who have filed an application for adjudication of a claim which the Department of Child Support Services determines is necessary to carry out its responsibilities pursuant to Section 17510 of the Family Code.

The process of sharing information with regard to applicants for and recipients of permanent disability benefits required by this section shall be known as the Workers’ Compensation Notification Project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 110.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

138.6.

(a) The administrative director, in consultation with the Insurance Commissioner and the Workers’ Compensation Insurance Rating Bureau, shall develop a cost-efficient workers’ compensation information system, which shall be administered by the division. The administrative director shall adopt regulations specifying the data elements to be collected by electronic data interchange.

(b) The information system shall do the following:

(1) Assist the department to manage the workers’ compensation system in an effective and efficient manner.

(2) Facilitate the evaluation of the efficiency and effectiveness of the delivery system.

(3) Assist in measuring how adequately the system indemnifies injured workers and their dependents.

(4) Provide statistical data for research into specific aspects of the workers’ compensation program.

(c) The data collected electronically shall be compatible with the Electronic Data Interchange System of the International Association of Industrial Accident Boards and Commissions. The administrative director may adopt regulations authorizing the use of other nationally recognized data transmission formats in addition to those set forth in the Electronic Data Interchange System for the transmission of data required pursuant to this section. The administrative director shall accept data transmissions in any authorized format. If the administrative director determines that any authorized data transmission format is not in
 general use by claims administrators, conflicts with the requirements of state or federal law, or is obsolete, the administrative director may adopt regulations eliminating that data transmission format from those authorized pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) (1) The administrative director shall assess an administrative penalty against a claims administrator for a violation of data reporting requirements adopted pursuant to this section. The administrative director shall promulgate a schedule of penalties providing for an assessment of no more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) against a claims administrator in any single year, calculated as follows:

(A) No more than one hundred dollars ($100) multiplied by the number of violations in that year that resulted in a required data report not being submitted or not being accepted.

(B) No more than fifty dollars ($50) multiplied by the number of violations in that year that resulted in a required report being late or accepted with an error.

(C) Multiple errors in a single report shall be counted as a single violation.

(D) No penalty shall be assessed pursuant to Section 129.5 for any violation of data reporting requirements for which a penalty has been or may be assessed pursuant to this section.

(2) The schedule promulgated by the administrative director pursuant to paragraph (1) shall establish threshold rates of violations that shall be excluded from the calculation of the assessment, as follows:

(A) The threshold rate for reports that are not submitted or are
 submitted but not accepted shall not be less than 3 percent of the number of reports that are required to be filed by or on behalf of the claims administrator.

(B) The threshold rate for reports that are accepted with an error shall not be less than 3 percent of the number of reports that are accepted with an error.

(C) The administrative director shall set higher threshold rates as appropriate in recognition of the fact that the data necessary for timely and accurate reporting may not be always available to a claims administrator or the claims administrator’s agents.

(D) The administrative director may establish higher thresholds for particular data elements that commonly are not reasonably available.

(3) The administrative director may estimate the
 number of required data reports that are not submitted by comparing a statistically valid sample of data available to the administrative director from other sources with the data reported pursuant to this section.

(4) All penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund.

(5) The administrative director shall publish an annual report disclosing the compliance rates of claims administrators and post the report and a list of claims administrators who are in violation of the data reporting requirements on the Internet Web site of the Division of Workers’ Compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 868, Sec. 2.   (SB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

138.7.

(a) Except as expressly permitted in subdivision (b), a person or public or private entity not a party to a claim for workers’ compensation benefits shall not obtain individually identifiable information obtained or maintained by the division regarding that claim. For purposes of this section, “individually identifiable information” means any data concerning an injury or claim that is linked to a uniquely identifiable employee, employer, claims administrator, or any other person or entity.

(b) (1) (A) The administrative director, or a statistical agent designated by the administrative director, may use individually identifiable information for
 purposes of creating and maintaining the workers’ compensation information system as specified in Section 138.6.

(B) The administrative director may publish the identity of claims administrators in the annual report disclosing the compliance rates of claims administrators pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 138.6.

(C) The administrative director shall use individually identifiable information for purposes of creating provider medical utilization data as specified in Section 138.8.

(2) (A) The State Department of Public Health may use individually identifiable information for purposes of establishing and maintaining a program on occupational health and occupational disease prevention as
 specified in Section 105175 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) (i) The State Department of Health Care Services may use individually identifiable information for purposes of seeking recovery of Medi-Cal costs incurred by the state for treatment provided to injured workers that should have been incurred by employers and insurance carriers pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 14124.70) of Chapter 7 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(ii) The Department of Industrial Relations shall furnish individually identifiable information to the State Department of Health Care Services, and the State Department of Health Care Services may furnish the information to its designated agent, provided that the individually identifiable
 information shall not be disclosed for use other than the purposes described in clause (i). The administrative director may adopt regulations solely for the purpose of governing access by the State Department of Health Care Services or its designated agents to the individually
 identifiable information as defined in subdivision (a).

(3) (A) Individually identifiable information may be used by the Division of Workers’ Compensation, the Division of Labor Standards and Enforcement, and the Division of Occupational Safety and Health as necessary to carry out their duties. The administrative director shall adopt regulations governing the access to the information described in this subdivision by these divisions. Any regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall set forth the specific uses for which this information may be obtained.

(B) Individually identifiable information maintained in the workers’ compensation information system and the Division of Workers’ Compensation may be used by researchers employed by or
 under contract to the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation as necessary to carry out the commission’s research. The administrative director shall adopt regulations governing the access to the information described in this subdivision by commission researchers. These regulations shall set forth the specific uses for which this information may be obtained and include provisions guaranteeing the confidentiality of individually identifiable information. Individually identifiable information obtained under this subdivision shall not be disclosed to commission members. Individually identifiable information obtained by researchers under contract to the commission pursuant to this subparagraph may not be disclosed to any other person or entity, public or private, for a use other than that research project for which the information was obtained. Within a reasonable period of time after
 the research for which the information was obtained has been completed, the data collected shall be modified in a manner so that the subjects cannot be identified, directly or through identifiers linked to the subjects.

(C) Individually identifiable information may be used by the Office of Self-Insurance Plans of the Department of Industrial Relations as necessary to carry out its duties, including evaluating the costs of administration, workers’ compensation benefit expenditures, and solvency and performance of the public self-insured employers’ workers’ compensation programs.

(4) The administrative director shall adopt regulations allowing reasonable access to individually identifiable information by other persons or public or private entities for the purpose of bona fide statistical
 research. This research shall not divulge individually identifiable information concerning a particular employee, employer, claims administrator, or any other person or entity. The regulations adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall include provisions guaranteeing the confidentiality of individually
 identifiable information. Within a reasonable period of time after the research for which the information was obtained has been completed, the data collected shall be modified in a manner so that the subjects cannot be identified, directly or through identifiers linked to the subjects.

(5) (A) This section does not exempt from disclosure any information that is considered to be a public record pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) contained in an individual’s file once an application for adjudication has been filed pursuant to Section 5501.5.

(B) Individually identifiable information shall not be provided to any person or public or private entity who is not
 a party to the claim unless that person self-identifies or that public or private entity identifies itself and states the reason for making the request. The administrative director may require the person or public or
 private entity making the request to produce information to verify that the name and address of the requester is valid and correct. If the purpose of the request is related to preemployment screening, the administrative director shall notify the person about whom the information is requested that the information was provided and shall include the following in 12-point type:
“IT MAY BE A VIOLATION OF FEDERAL AND STATE LAW TO DISCRIMINATE AGAINST A JOB APPLICANT BECAUSE THE APPLICANT HAS FILED A CLAIM FOR WORKERS’ COMPENSATION BENEFITS.”
(C) Any residence address is confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person or public or private entity except to a party to the claim, a law enforcement agency, an
 office of a district attorney, any person for a journalistic purpose, or other governmental agency.

(D) This paragraph does not prohibit the use of individually identifiable information for purposes of identifying bona fide lien claimants.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), individually identifiable information obtained by the division is privileged and is not subject to subpoena in a civil proceeding unless, after reasonable notice to the division and a hearing, a court determines that the public interest and the intent of this section will not be jeopardized by disclosure of the information. This section does not restrict access to information by any law enforcement agency or district attorney’s office nor limit admissibility of that information in a criminal
 proceeding.

(d) It is unlawful for any person who has received individually identifiable information from the division pursuant to this section to provide that information to any person who is not entitled to it under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 120.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

138.8.

(a) On or before January 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the administrative director shall publish on the division’s internet website provider utilization data, as reported to the Division of Workers’ Compensation, for physicians who treated 10 or more injured workers during the 12 months before July 1 of the previous year. The provider utilization data shall include all of the
 following:

(1) The physician’s first and last name.

(2) The physician’s specialty.

(3) The physician’s National Provider Identifier.

(4) The number of injured workers treated by the physician.

(5) The International Statistical Classification of Diseases and Related Health Problems, 10th revision (ICD-10) codes by both diagnosis and procedure.

(6) A short description of the ICD-10 codes used by the physician.

(7) The number of utilization review decisions that resulted in a
 modification or denial of a request for authorization of medical treatment based upon a determination of medical necessity.

(8) The number of independent medical review decisions issued in response to an appeal of a utilization review decision that resulted in a modification or denial based upon medical necessity and the number of independent
 medical review decisions that resulted in the utilization review modification or denial being overturned.

(9) Any additional data as determined by the administrative
 director.

(b) For purposes of this section, “physician” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 3209.3.

(c) The administrative director may withhold data contained in subdivision (a) if deemed necessary to protect patient privacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 647, Sec. 3.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

139.2.

(a) The administrative director shall appoint qualified medical evaluators in each of the respective specialties as required for the evaluation of medical-legal issues. The appointments shall be for two-year terms.

(b) The administrative director shall appoint or reappoint as a qualified medical evaluator a physician, as defined in Section 3209.3, who is licensed to practice in this state and who demonstrates that he or she meets the requirements in paragraphs (1), (2), (6), and (7), and, if the physician is a medical doctor, doctor of osteopathy, doctor of chiropractic, or a psychologist, that he or she also meets the applicable requirements in paragraph (3), (4), or (5).

(1) Prior to his or her
 appointment as a qualified medical evaluator, passes an examination written and administered by the administrative director for the purpose of demonstrating competence in evaluating medical-legal issues in the workers’ compensation system. Physicians shall not be required to pass an additional examination as a condition of reappointment. A physician seeking appointment as a qualified medical evaluator on or after January 1, 2001, shall also complete prior to appointment, a course on disability evaluation report writing approved by the administrative director. The administrative director shall specify the curriculum to be covered by disability evaluation report writing courses, which shall include, but is not limited to, 12 or more hours of instruction.
